Washington statutes.
RCW 39.30.045

Purchase at auctions.

Any municipality, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, may purchase any supplies, equipment, or materials at auctions conducted by the government of the United States or any agency thereof, any agency of the state of Washington, any municipality or other government agency, or any private party without being subject to public bidding requirements if the items can be obtained at a competitive price.

[ 1993 c 198 s 4; 1991 c 363 s 112.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.